incubator/apertium-sin/apertium-sin.sin.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>අආඇඈඉඊඋඌඍඎඑඒඓඔඕඖකඛගඝඞඟචඡජඣඤඥඦටඨඩඪණඬතථදධනඳපඵබභමඹයරලවශෂසහළෆ ් ා ැ ෑ ි ී ු ූ ෘ ෙ ේ ෛ ො ෝ ෞ ෟ ෲ ෳ ෴ ඃ ං</alphabet>
	
	<sdefs>     
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>     
			<sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
			<sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
			<sdef n="cog"     c="Cognomen"/>	
			<sdef n="top"     c="Topological"/>
			<sdef n="subj"    c="subject"/>
			<sdef n="org"     c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>     
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>    
    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="obj"     c="Object"/>    
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="abl"     c="Ablative"/>
    <sdef n="erg"     c="Ergative"/>        
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>        
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>     
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>     
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>     
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/> 
    <sdef n="ger"		  c="Gerund"/>    
		<sdef n="frm"	  	c="formal"/>
		<sdef n="def"	  	c="Definite"/>
		<sdef n="voc"	  	c="vocal"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>        
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="adverbial conjunction"/>              
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>     
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>     
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>     
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Male/Female"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>        
    <sdef n="vaux"    c="Auxiliary Verb"/>     
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>     
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>     
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular/Plural"/>        
    <sdef n="itg"     c="interrogative"/>     
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/> 
    <sdef n="acc"     c="Accusative"/>    
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>        
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possesive"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt"     c="Quantifier"/>            
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>        
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>      
    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>     
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>     
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>      
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>     
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>        
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>     
		<sdef n="impf"    c="Imperfective participle"/>
		<sdef n="perf"    c="Perfective participle"/>  
		<sdef n="sint"    c="Synthetic"/>
		<sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/> 
		<sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>  
		<sdef n="tv"     	c="transitive"/> 	
		<sdef n="iv"     	c="intransitive"/> 	
    <sdef n="prs"    	c="Subjunctive"/>     
    <sdef n="fut"    	c="Future"/>
		<sdef n="imp"    	c="Imperative"/>
		<sdef n="gna"    	c="verbal adverb"/>
		<sdef n="agnt"    c="agentive"/>
		<sdef n="pri"    	c="present indicative"/>	 	 
		<sdef n="stem"  	c="stem"/>
		<sdef n="ord"  		c="ordinal"/>
   	<sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"    c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"   c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"   c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/>
  </sdefs> 

	<pardefs>
	
	<!-- SECTION: Numerals -->
		<pardef n="numeros">
			<e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
    
		<pardef n="one__num">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

	<pardef n="two__num">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="twenty__num">
		<e><p><l>-එක</l><r>-එක</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e><p><l>-දෙක</l><r>-දෙක</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e><p><l>-තුන</l><r>-තුන</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e><p><l>-හතර</l><r>-හතර</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e><p><l>-පහ</l><r>-පහ</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e><p><l>-හය</l><r>-හය</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e><p><l>-හත</l><r>-හත</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e><p><l>-අට</l><r>-අට</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e><p><l>-නවය</l><r>-නවය</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
	</pardef>
		
	
  <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->
		<pardef n="separa">
			<e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
	
		<pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    
  	<!-- SECTION: Proper Nouns -->     
    
    <pardef n="ජේම්ස්/__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගේ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ට</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගෙන්</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ව</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  
            
    <pardef n="මේරි/__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගේ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ට</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගෙන්</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ව</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>   
    
    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns --> 
    
		<pardef n="ම/ම__prn">
    	<e><p><l>ම</l><r>ම<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගේ</l><r>ම<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ට</l><r>ම<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ගෙන්</l><r>ම<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ාව</l><r>ම<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="අ/ප__prn">
    	<e><p><l>පි</l><r>ප<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>පේ</l><r>ප<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>පට</l><r>ප<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>පෙන්</l><r>ප<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ව</l><r>ප<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
		<pardef n="ඔ/බ__prn">
    	<e><p><l>බ</l><r>බ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>බේ</l><r>බ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>බට</l><r>බ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>බෙන්</l><r>බ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ව</l><r>බ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

		<e lm="එක"><i>එක</i><par n="one__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දෙක"><i>දෙක</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="තුන"><i>තුන</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="හතර"><i>හතර</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="පහ"><i>පහ</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="හය"><i>හය</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="හත"><i>හත</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="අට"><i>අට</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="නවය"><i>නවය</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දහය"><i>දහය</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දස"><i>දස</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="එකොලහ"><i>එකොලහ</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දොලහ"><i>දොලහ</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දහතුන"><i>දහතුන</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දහහතර"><i>දහහතර</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="පහලොව"><i>පහලොව</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දහසය"><i>දහසය</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දහහත"><i>දහහත</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දහඅට"><i>දහඅට</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දහනවය"><i>දහනවය</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="විස්ස"><i>විස්ස</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="විසි"><i>විසි</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
		<e lm="තිහ"><i>තිහ</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="තිස්"><i>තිස්</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
		<e lm="හතලිහ"><i>හතලිහ</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="හතලිස්"><i>හතලිස්</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
		<e lm="පණහ"><i>පණහ</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="පණස්"><i>පණස්</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
		<e lm="හැට"><i>හැට</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="හැට"><i>හැට</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
		<e lm="හැත්තෑව"><i>හැත්තෑව</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="හැත්තෑ"><i>හැත්තෑ</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
		<e lm="අසූව"><i>අසූව</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="අසූ"><i>අසූ</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
		<e lm="අනූව"><i>අනූව</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="අනූ"><i>අනූ</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
		<e lm="සියය"><i>සියය</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="සිය"><i>සිය</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දහස"><i>දහස</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="දහස්"><i>දහස්</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="මිලියනය"><i>මිලියනය</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="මිලියන"><i>මිලියන</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
		<e lm="ම"><i>ම</i><par n="ම/ම__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="අ"><i>අ</i><par n="අ/ප__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="ඔ"><i>ඔ</i><par n="ඔ/බ__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="ජේම්ස්"><i>ජේම්ස්</i><par n="ජේම්ස්/__np"/></e>
		<e lm="මේරි"><i>මේරි</i><par n="මේරි/__np"/></e>
